dicts/be_BY/be_BY.aff
# Belarusian affix file and dictionaries
# Version number: 0.56
# Copyright: Mikalai Udodau (C) 2010-2012
# License: Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike
# See http://creativecommons.org/licenses/by-sa/3.0/
SET UTF-8
TRY аяоёйцукжеэнгшўзхіыпрлдюьбвтмсчфАЯОЁЙЦУКЖЕЭНГШЎЗХІЫПРЛДЮЬБВТМСЧФ'
WORDCHARS '
REP 40
REP а у 
REP ваў ў 
REP дзь д 
REP ей ёў 
REP ейв яв 
REP еньва яне 
REP ецца юць 
REP еч юш 
REP з сы 
REP зі ы 
REP ій яў 
REP іра а 
REP іра я 
REP іру у 
REP іру ю 
REP іся і 
REP йо ё 
REP Йо Ё 
REP к каў 
REP каў к 
REP ке цы 
REP наў н 
REP с на 
REP сь ш 
REP то цё 
REP ты ці 
REP тэ фе 
REP тэ фі 
REP у 'ю 
REP ўся ў 
REP ц дс 
REP ца ь 
REP ш ін 
REP ь ' 
REP ье а 
REP ьг ы 
REP ьі ы 
REP эй оў 
REP яль й 
REP яў й 
MAP 20
MAP c с
MAP i і
MAP а о
MAP а э
MAP е ё
MAP е я
MAP з с
MAP о а
MAP т ф
MAP т ц
MAP у ў
MAP ы і
MAP э а
MAP э е
MAP я е
MAP зь з
MAP ль л
MAP нь н
MAP сь с
MAP ць ц
BREAK 2
BREAK -
BREAK –
PFX A Y 1
PFX A 0 не .
PFX p Y 1
PFX p 0 па .
PFX z Y 1
PFX z 0 за .
PFX u Y 1
PFX u ў у . 
PFX i Y 1
PFX i 0 і . 
SFX D Y 15
SFX D а ы [бвджзлмнпрстфцчш]а 
SFX D а і [гкх]а 
SFX D а е [бвзлмнпсф]а 
SFX D га зе га 
SFX D да дзе да 
SFX D ка цэ ка 
SFX D та це та 
SFX D ха се ха 
SFX D а у а 
SFX D а ой а 
SFX D а ою а 
SFX D я і я 
SFX D я ю я 
SFX D я ёй я 
SFX D я ёю я 
SFX E Y 15
SFX E а ы [бвджзлмнпрстфцчш]а 
SFX E а і [гкх]а 
SFX E а е [бвзлмнпсф]а 
SFX E га зе га 
SFX E да дзе да 
SFX E ка цы ка 
SFX E та це та 
SFX E ха се ха 
SFX E а у а 
SFX E а ай а 
SFX E а аю а 
SFX E я і я 
SFX E я ю я 
SFX E я яй я 
SFX E я яю я 
SFX F Y 29
SFX F а ы [бвджзлмнпрстфцчш]а 
SFX F а і [гкх]а 
SFX F а 0 [бджзлмнпрстфхцчш]а 
SFX F ва ў ва 
SFX F га аг [бджзлмнпрстфцчш]га 
SFX F га г [аеёіоуыэюя]га 
SFX F ка ак [бджзлмнпрстфцчш]ка 
SFX F йка ек йка 
SFX F ўка вак ўка 
SFX F ька ек ька 
SFX F ка к [аеёіоуыэюя]ка 
SFX F а ам а 
SFX F а амі а 
SFX F а ах а 
SFX F я й [аеёіоуыэюя]я 
SFX F ля ль [аеёіоуыэюя]ля 
SFX F ля ель [бмпф]ля 
SFX F ня нь [аеёіоуыэюя]ня 
SFX F йня ень йня 
SFX F ня ань [рхш]ня 
SFX F ня ень [с]ня 
SFX F ўня вень ўня 
SFX F я ям я 
SFX F я ямі я 
SFX F я ях я 
SFX F і й і 
SFX F і ям і 
SFX F і ямі і 
SFX F і ях і 
SFX G Y 18
SFX G і 0 [гх]і 
SFX G кі к [аеёіоуыэю]кі 
SFX G йкі ек йкі 
SFX G ўкі вак ўкі 
SFX G ькі ек ькі 
SFX G кі ак [бгджзлмнпрстфхцчш]кі 
SFX G ы 0 [бджзлмнпрстфцчш]ы 
SFX G вы ў вы 
SFX G е 0 е 
SFX G е ам е 
SFX G е амі е 
SFX G е ах е 
SFX G і ам [гкх]і 
SFX G і амі [гкх]і 
SFX G і ах [гкх]і 
SFX G ы ам ы 
SFX G ы амі ы 
SFX G ы ах ы 
SFX O Y 20
SFX O 0 а [бвгджзлмнпрстфхчш] 
SFX O а і [гкх]а 
SFX O а ы [вдзлнртцш]а 
SFX O е я е 
SFX O ё я ё 
SFX O й я й 
SFX O к ка [еійнрсуўцыэюя]к 
SFX O ак ка [бджзлмнпрстчш]ак 
SFX O вак ўка вак 
SFX O ёк ька ёк 
SFX O ок ка [бджзлмнпрстчш]ок 
SFX O вок ўка вок 
SFX O о а о 
SFX O ў ва ў 
SFX O ц ца [аінрыья]ц 
SFX O ец ца [бзмнпсф]ец 
SFX O вец ўца вец 
SFX O лец льца лец 
SFX O ь я ь 
SFX O я і я 
SFX H Y 52
SFX H а у а 
SFX H е ю е 
SFX H ё ю ё 
SFX H й ю й 
SFX H к ку [еёійлнрсуўцыэюя]к 
SFX H ак ку [бджзлмнпрстчш]ак 
SFX H вак ўку вак 
SFX H ок ку [бджзлмнпрстчш]ок 
SFX H вок ўку вок 
SFX H ў ву ў 
SFX H ц цу [аірыья]ц 
SFX H ец цу [бзмнпсф]ец 
SFX H вец ўцу вец 
SFX H лец льцу лец 
SFX H ь ю ь 
SFX H я ю я 
SFX H 0 у [бвгджзлмнпрстфхчш] 
SFX H 0 ам [бвгджзлмнпрстфхчш] 
SFX H а ам а 
SFX H е ем е 
SFX H я ем я 
SFX H й ем й 
SFX H ь ем ь 
SFX H у ам у 
SFX H ў вам ў 
SFX H к кам [еёійлнорсуўцыэюя]к 
SFX H ак кам [бджзлмнпрстчш]ак 
SFX H вак ўкам вак 
SFX H ц цам [аірыья]ц 
SFX H ец цам [бзмнпсф]ец 
SFX H вец ўцам вец 
SFX H лец льцам лец 
SFX H а е [бвзлмнпсф]а 
SFX H да дзе да 
SFX H а ы [жрцчш]а 
SFX H та це та 
SFX H 0 е [бвзлмнпсф] 
SFX H д дзе д 
SFX H е і е 
SFX H ё і ё 
SFX H 0 ы [жрчш] 
SFX H й і й 
SFX H т це т 
SFX H у ы [жрчш]у 
SFX H ў ве ў 
SFX H х ху х 
SFX H ц цы [аірыья]ц 
SFX H ец цы [бзмнпсф]ец 
SFX H вец ўцы вец 
SFX H лец льцы лец 
SFX H ь і ь 
SFX H я і я 
SFX U Y 61
SFX U а у а 
SFX U е ю е 
SFX U ё ю ё 
SFX U й ю й 
SFX U к ку [еійлнрсуўцыэюя]к 
SFX U ак ку [бджзлмнпрстчш]ак 
SFX U вак ўку вак 
SFX U ёк ьку ёк 
SFX U ок ку [бджзлмнпрстчш]ок 
SFX U вок ўку вок 
SFX U о у о 
SFX U ў ву ў 
SFX U ц цу [аірыья]ц 
SFX U ец цу [бзмнпсф]ец 
SFX U вец ўцу вец 
SFX U лец льцу лец 
SFX U ь ю ь 
SFX U я ю я 
SFX U 0 у [бвгджзлмнпрстфхчш] 
SFX U 0 ом [бвгджзлмнпрстфхчш] 
SFX U а ом а 
SFX U е ём е 
SFX U ё ём ё 
SFX U й ём й 
SFX U о ом о 
SFX U к ком [аеійлнрсуўцыэюя]к 
SFX U ёк ьком ёк 
SFX U ок ком [бджзлмнпрстчш]ок 
SFX U вок ўком вок 
SFX U у ом у 
SFX U ў вом ў 
SFX U ь ём ь 
SFX U ю ём ю 
SFX U я ём я 
SFX U ц цом [аірыья]ц 
SFX U ец цом [бзмнпсф]ец 
SFX U вец ўцом вец 
SFX U лец льцом лец 
SFX U а е [бвзлмнпсф]а 
SFX U да дзе да 
SFX U а ы [жрчш]а 
SFX U та це та 
SFX U о е [бвзлмнпсф]о 
SFX U о зе до 
SFX U ро ры ро 
SFX U у ы [жрчш]у 
SFX U ў ве ў 
SFX U д дзе д 
SFX U 0 ы [жрчш] 
SFX U т це т 
SFX U х ху х 
SFX U ец цы [бзмнпсф]ец 
SFX U вец ўцы вец 
SFX U лец льцы лец 
SFX U е і е 
SFX U ё і ё 
SFX U й і й 
SFX U ь і ь 
SFX U ю і ю 
SFX U я і я 
SFX U 0 е [бвзлмнпсф] 
SFX P Y 59
SFX P а ы [бвджзлмнпрстфцчш]а 
SFX P а і [гкх]а 
SFX P 0 ы [бвджзлмнпрстфцчш] 
SFX P 0 і [гкх] 
SFX P е і е 
SFX P ё і ё 
SFX P й і й 
SFX P о ы о 
SFX P ў вы ў 
SFX P ь і ь 
SFX P я і я 
SFX P а аў а 
SFX P 0 аў [бвгджзклмнпрстфхцчш] 
SFX P е яў е 
SFX P ё яў ё 
SFX P й яў й 
SFX P о аў о 
SFX P ў ваў ў 
SFX P ь яў ь 
SFX P я яў я 
SFX P а ам а 
SFX P 0 ам [бвгджзклмнпрстфхцчш] 
SFX P е ям е 
SFX P ё ям ё 
SFX P й ям й 
SFX P о ам о 
SFX P ў вам ў 
SFX P ь ям ь 
SFX P я ям я 
SFX P а амі а 
SFX P 0 амі [бвгджзклмнпрстфхцчш] 
SFX P е ямі е 
SFX P ё ямі ё 
SFX P й ямі й 
SFX P о амі о 
SFX P ў вамі ў 
SFX P ь ямі ь 
SFX P я ямі я 
SFX P а ах а 
SFX P 0 ах [бвгджзклмнпрстфхцчш] 
SFX P е ях е 
SFX P ё ях ё 
SFX P о ах о 
SFX P й ях й 
SFX P ў вах ў 
SFX P ь ях ь 
SFX P я ях я 
SFX P і яў [бвдезлмнопстфц']і 
SFX P і ям [бвдезлмнопстфц']і 
SFX P і ямі [бвдезлмнопстфц']і 
SFX P і ях [бвдезлмнопстфц']і 
SFX P і аў [гкх]і 
SFX P і ам [гкх]і 
SFX P і амі [гкх]і 
SFX P і ах [гкх]і 
SFX P ы аў ы 
SFX P ы ам ы 
SFX P ы амі ы 
SFX P ы ах ы 
SFX Q Y 50
SFX Q а ы [бвджзлмнпрстфцчш]а 
SFX Q а і [гкх]а 
SFX Q 0 ы [бвджзлмнпрстфцчш] 
SFX Q 0 і [гкх] 
SFX Q о ы о 
SFX Q ь і ь 
SFX Q а оў а 
SFX Q 0 оў [бвгджзклмнпрстфхцчш] 
SFX Q е ёў е 
SFX Q ё ёў ё 
SFX Q і ёў [азілмносуў']і 
SFX Q і оў [гкх]і 
SFX Q й ёў й 
SFX Q ь ёў ь 
SFX Q о оў о 
SFX Q ы оў ы 
SFX Q я ёў я 
SFX Q а ам а 
SFX Q 0 ам [бвгджзклмнпрстфхцчш] 
SFX Q е ям е 
SFX Q ё ям ё 
SFX Q і ям [азілмносуў']і 
SFX Q і ам [гкх]і 
SFX Q й ям й 
SFX Q о ам о 
SFX Q ы ам ы 
SFX Q ь ям ь 
SFX Q я ям я 
SFX Q а амі а 
SFX Q 0 амі [бвгджзклмнпрстфхцчш] 
SFX Q е ямі е 
SFX Q ё ямі ё 
SFX Q і ямі [азілмносуў']і 
SFX Q і амі [гкх]і 
SFX Q й ямі й 
SFX Q о амі о 
SFX Q ы амі ы 
SFX Q ь ямі ь 
SFX Q я ямі я 
SFX Q а ах а 
SFX Q 0 ах [бвгджзклмнпрстфхцчш] 
SFX Q е ях е 
SFX Q ё ях ё 
SFX Q і ях [азілмносуў']і 
SFX Q і ах [гкх]і 
SFX Q й ях й 
SFX Q о ах о 
SFX Q ы ах ы 
SFX Q ь ях ь 
SFX Q я ях я 
SFX T Y 15
SFX T 0 і [бф] 
SFX T 0 ы [жрчшц] 
SFX T ь і [злнсц]ь 
SFX T дзь ддзю дзь 
SFX T зь ззю [аеёіоуыэюя]зь 
SFX T ль ллю ль 
SFX T нь нню нь 
SFX T сь ссю сь 
SFX T ць ццю [аеёіоуыэюя]ць 
SFX T ць цю [рсў]ць 
SFX T ж жжу ж 
SFX T ш шшу ш 
SFX T ч ччу ч 
SFX T 0 ю [ў] 
SFX T 0 'ю [брф] 
SFX L Y 36
SFX L а эй а 
SFX L а ам а 
SFX L а амі а 
SFX L а ах а 
SFX L 0 і [бф] 
SFX L 0 ей [бф] 
SFX L 0 ям [бф] 
SFX L 0 ямі [бф] 
SFX L 0 ях [бф] 
SFX L 0 ы [жрцчш] 
SFX L 0 эй [жрцчш] 
SFX L 0 ам [жрцчш] 
SFX L 0 амі [жрцчш] 
SFX L 0 ах [жрцчш] 
SFX L і ей і 
SFX L і ям і 
SFX L і ямі і 
SFX L і ях і 
SFX L ы эй ы 
SFX L ы ам ы 
SFX L ы амі ы 
SFX L ы ах ы 
SFX L ь ей ь 
SFX L ь ям ь 
SFX L ь ямі ь 
SFX L ь ях ь 
SFX L я ей я 
SFX L я ям я 
SFX L я ямі я 
SFX L я ях я 
SFX L ей ям ей 
SFX L ей ямі ей 
SFX L ей ях ей 
SFX L эй ам эй 
SFX L эй амі эй 
SFX L эй ах эй 
