dicts/be_BY/be_BY.dic
адмысловы/VXA
аднаверца/HP
адчэпка/E
адшчапленне/OH
азартнасць/T
азёрцы/P
азначальны/VXA
аканіца/EF
акладня/DL
аковы/G
апазненне/OH
апойка/EF
армада/EF
армяне/G
архіпелаг/OHP
арыгінальны/VXA
аслабленне/OH
ашаляваны/VA
аэрасані/L
бабуля/EF
бадмінтаніст/OHP
байца/UQ
баланда/D
бальзаміраваны/VXz
бальшун/OUQ
барэльеф/OHP
бегласць/T
бетаную/cfhz
благавешчанне/OH
блажэю/cfhp
блізняты/G
бракаваны/VXz
брахня/D
брахуха/EF
брукую/cfhz
брухач/OUQ
бручка/EF
будую/cfhbjxp
бузацёр/OHP
буйка/UQ
бяздзейнасць/T
вагон/OHP
ваўчка/UQ
вачэй/L
везлі/p
вехі/G
вешалка/EF
вешанне/OHp
відната/D
вісла/pz
віткі/Q
вічанішча/H
воласць/TL
восень/T
вуалюю/cfhz
вуглевыпальшчык/OHP
вымагальніца/EF
выпрабаваны/VXA
гавань/TL
газовачка/EF
галун/UO
Ганцавічы/G
гара/D
Гардзіенка/OH
гарняк/OUQ
гароднік/OHP
гатэнтот/POH
гаць/TL
гістарычнасць/T
глухла/z
гораўзыходніца/EF
грузіць/lmwqotp
грушападобны/Vi
Грыцук/OU
губа/EDF
гушчарнік/HP
даедзены/VXA
далонь/TLP
дар/HQ
дарвініст/OHP
дасеўкі/G
дасканалы/VXA
датаванне/OH
дзеравянею/cfhz
дзераза/D
дзеяздольнасць/TA
дзяжурка/EF
дорыць/op
драздзяняты/G
дубец/OU
дырыжор/OHP
дыяганаль/TL
дыяскоп/OHP
дэпеша/EF
екцення/D
жанішкі/Q
жгут/OUQ
забяспечанасць/T
загарадзь/TL
зажынкі/G
заідэалагізаваны/VXA
замацаванне/OH
запасніка/UQ
запісаны/VXA
зарад/OHP
зарысоўка/EF
званіць/lmp
здаволенасць/T
зневажальніца/EF
зноў/i
зубаскал/OHP
ідэнтычны/VXA
Ізмаіл/OH
ікра/D
інкасатар/OHP
іншапланецяне/G
іранічнасць/T
кабачкі/Q
казань/TL
каламуціцца/vjzp
каланок/OU
камечыць/op
кампенсацыя/EF
канва/D
кандэлябр/OHP
кансерваванне/OH
канспектую/cfhz
канцоўка/EF
караннік/OUQ
карэнны/VA
каснік/OUQ
касцей/L
квінтэт/OHP
кіслоты/G
кісцяня/UQ
кісяя/D
кітабой/OHP
кітую/cfhzp
клапотнасць/T
клапочуць/p
клоўн/OHP
кнігавыдавец/OU
кніганоша/OHEF
коўка/E
крайнасць/TLP
крышталізуюцца/z
кураня/UQ
кучма/DPQ
лабач/OUQ
лавірую/cfhp
лганне/OHi
лгу/egi
лгуння/EPi
лебедзяняты/G
лётчык/OHP
лжывы/VXi
лжэсведчанне/OHi
лілея/EF
літаўра/PE
луг/HQ
Льва/U
львянё/i
льга/i
льдзінка/EFi
льнаводства/Hi
льнозавод/OHi
льнотраста/Di
льнянішча/Hi
лядашчасць/T
лянуйся/p
ляўша/DL
мазурка/EF
Максімка/OH
мардую/cfhbjxz
маржаняты/G
матня/EL
матываваны/VXA
маўчуха/EF
машна/D
медбрат/OHP
мерзляка/UQ
мізарнею/cfhp
многаступеннасць/T
мораны/VXzp
мху/i
мясакамбінат/OHP
наглядчыца/EF
нажніцы/G
нарсуд/OU
натоўп/HP
нахлебніца/EF
націскны/ZA
неафіцыйнасць/T
немата/D
непрыемнасць/TLP
непрыязнасць/T
няслі/Kp
няўцямнасць/T
павадок/OU
пака/HQ
паказанне/OHP
палісмен/OHP
палосы/G
палярына/EF
панчошка/FE
пасільны/VXA
Патабня/D
патрыцый/OHP
патрэбнасць/TL
патэнтаваны/VXz
паўсюднасць/T
Пацеюк/OU
перадкі/Q
перакормліванне/OH
пісьменны/VXA
плед/OHP
плеўка/EF
посцілка/EF
праліццё/OU
прастрэльванне/OH
працівіцца/vjz
пропаведзь/TLP
прыблуда/OHEP
прыдатнасць/TA
прысады/G
прыхільнасць/TA
прышч/OUQ
пустагаловасць/T
пустата/D
пярына/EF
раднюся/p
радыёапарат/OHP
ражна/UQ
разарэнне/OH
разгародка/EF
разнавіднасць/TLP
раўназначны/VXA
рачаняты/G
рваць/fji
рдзенне/OHi
ржавасць/Ti
ржанне/OHi
ржышча/Hi
рубцы/Q
рум/HP
рэдагаванне/OH
рэзчыца/EF
рэтушую/cfhz
саланец/U
сапраўдны/VXA
саха/D
саюзніца/EF
светласць/T
світанне/OHP
свяжэю/cfhp
сенніка/UQ
сёлы/GP
скорасніца/EF
солены/VXpz
соль/TL
сохнуць/z
спадзяванне/OHP
справядлівасць/TA
стаўка/UQ
стракатня/D
страусяняты/G
стужкавы/Vi
стыхар/OUQ
суботнік/OHP
сука/EF
супрацоўнік/OHP
суразмерны/VXA
схаластычнасць/T
схованка/EF
сцелецца/p
тапчан/OUQ
тлуміць/lmoz
тонкасць/TL
траскатня/D
трусяняты/G
трызніцца/vjp
тунэльшчык/OHP
ўвасобіць/kmou
ўгар/Hu
ўдакладніцца/vju
ўдушвацца/bdjxu
ўзбуджаны/VXu
ўзгоркі/Pu
ўзнагародзіць/kmou
ўзрывы/Pu
ўказальны/VXu
ўкладальніца/EFu
ўкрапаю/cfhu
ўлічаны/VXu
ўмну/egu
ўніят/OHPu
ўпайка/Eu
ўпёрты/VXu
ўпяклі/Ku
ўрубавы/Vu
ўскіну/cfhu
ўспаўзяце/u
ўстояны/Vu
ўсюдыісны/Vu
ўтрапёны/VXu
ўтрыманец/OHu
ўшморгнуты/VXu
фетыш/OHUPQ
фотамантаж/UQ
хаценне/OH
хвацкасць/T
хрыстосуецца/p
хрысціны/G
цаглінка/EF
цана/D
цвярозы/VXA
цеплаэлектрацэнтраль/TL
цкаваны/VXz
цукравар/OHP
цымбалістка/EF
частую/cfhbjxp
чахну/cgz
чыгунок/OU
чыркі/Q
шаптала/D
шкіпер/OHP
шматтыражка/EF
шпачаняты/G
штэмпеляваць/fzp
шэрх/z
экспанаванне/OH
эрдэльтэр'ер/OHP
эспаньёлка/EF
яскравасць/T
